Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1731
Family services; legislative intent.

The Legislature recognizes that parents should continue to have the primary responsibility for meeting the needs of their children but that if a family requires services it should be able to receive services which are available, accessible, and equitable. It is the intent of the Legislature that such services should be coordinated between agencies serving common populations and that whenever possible a plan should be implemented for location of services together to provide consistent, efficient, and effective services.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 31.